North Dakota, session 69, HB1265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
State information technology research center - Report.
1. The state information technology research center is created to conduct exploratory ,
transformational, and innovative research to promote the development of data
science, data analysis, software engineering, and advanced information technology in
the state.
2. To carry out the purposes of this section, the state information technology research
center must operate as a collaborative virtual center. The state information technology
center may:
a. Select the research topics and projects to be pursued;
b. Enter contracts or agreements with other North Dakota institutions of higher
education, the information technology department, and federal, private, and
nonprofit organizations to support research topics and projects;
c. Assist in the development of advanced technology solutions, including artificial
intelligence, machine learning, quantum computing, digital literacy, and
cybersecurity initiatives;
Page No. 1 25.0918.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
d. Encourage the establishment of data centers in the state to enhance advanced
technology products and initiatives;
e. Use existing staff resources, to the extent authorized by legislative
appropriations, between participating state agencies for the purpose of advancing
research and development of projects selected under this section; and
f. Accept donations, grants, contributions, and gifts from any source to carry out the
selected research topics and projects, which must be deposited in the advanced
technology grant fund.
3. The state information technology research center shall report all research activities
and accomplishments by October first of each year to the legislative management's
information technology committee. Upon request, the state information technology
research center shall report all research activities and accomplishments to the
appropriations committees of the legislative assembly.
SECTION 2. A new chapter to title 54 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions
In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Chief information officer" means the chief information officer of the information
technology department.
2. "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the department of commerce.
3. "Committee" means the advanced technology review committee.
4. " Departmen t " means the information technology department .
5. "Vice chancellor for information technology" means the chief information officer and
vice chancellor for information technology of the North Dakota university system.
Advanced technology review committee - Membership - Meetings.
1. The advanced technology review committee consists of:
a. The chief information officer or a designee within the information technology
department;
b. The vice chancellor for information technology or a designee within the North
Dakota university system;
Page No. 2 25.0918.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. One individual from the private sector with significant information and advanced
technology knowledge, appointed by the governor;
d. One individual from the private sector with significant information and advanced
technology knowledge, appointed by the majority leader of the house of
representatives;
e. One individual from the private sector with significant information and advanced
technology knowledge, appointed by the majority leader of the senate; and
f. The commissioner, or a designee within the department of commerce, who shall
serve as a nonvoting member of the committee and provide recommendations to
the committee regarding grant awards.
g. The executive director of a digital academy administered by the North Dakota
university system.
2. By July first of each odd - numbered year, the chief information officer and vice
chancellor for information technology shall compile a list of individuals with significant
private sector information and advanced technology knowledge working within the
state to be forwarded to the governor and the majority leaders of the house of
representatives and senate. The governor and the majority leaders of the house of
representatives and senate must consider the listed individuals for committee
membership appointments.
3. The chief information officer, vice chancellor for information technology, and
commissioner are permanent members of the committee. The term of office of the
members of the committee appointed from the private sector is four years except the
initial term of office of the individual appointed by the majority leader of the senate is
three years and the initial term of office of the individual appointed by the governor is
two years. Each term of office commences on August first. Members serve at the
pleasure of the appointing entity and may be reappointed for additional terms. By
August first of each year, the chairman of the legislative management shall select one
of the appointed members to serve as the chairman of the committee. The chairman of
the committee shall select a vice chair. If a committee member ceases to qualify as a
member of the appointing entity, that individual's membership on the committee
Page No. 3 25.0918.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
ceases immediately and the appointing entity shall appoint a new member to the
committee for the remainder of the term.
4. A committee member representing the private sector is entitled to receive
compensation in an amount not exceeding one hundred thirty - five dollars per day and
travel and expense reimbursement as provided by law for state officers for attending
meetings of the committee, to be paid by the departmen t within the limits of legislative
appropriations.
5. The committee shall meet at the call of the chairman to review and approve grant
applications from entrepreneurs, startup companies, and small businesses that are in
the initial phases of advanced technology product research, development, and
innovation and are unable to access financial resources for prototype product
development.
Compute credits grant program - Eligibility - Use of funds.
1. The departmen t shall administer the compute credits grant program to provide grants
for activities identified in this chapter. The department shall provide administrative
support for the program, including the drafting of application forms, receiving
applications, reviewing applications for completeness and compliance with committee
policy, and forwarding complete applications to the committee in accordance with the
guidelines established by the committee.
2. The committee shall establish guidelines for entities to qualify for a compute credits
grant under this section.
3. In determining whether to approve an application for grant funding, the committee
shall consider the extent to which the applicant's proposal will support the
development of advanced technology solutions, including artificial intelligence,
machine learning, quantum computing, digital literacy, and cybersecurity initiatives.
The committee shall give priority to applications with a greater likelihood of attracting
other information technology businesses to the state. The committee shall consider
and process applications in a timely manner to allow applicants an opportunity to
leverage other funds.
4. Grant recipients shall use funding awarded under this section for the cost of increased
compute credits and central processing unit storage capacity that promotes the
Page No. 4 25.0918.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
program requirements in subsection 3 of this section . An entity receiving a grant under
this section may not use the funds for capital or building investments or other activities
not identified in this chapter. The funds may not be used for administrative costs or to
supplant funding for regular operations of the entity. If an entity awarded a grant no
longer conducts its activities in the state, the entity must repay the awarded grant
funding to departmen t .
Advanced technology grant fund.
The advanced technology grant fund is a special fund in the state treasury administered by
the department. Moneys in the fund must be used for providing grants and for the payment of
committee and department administrative expenses incurred related to the requirements of this
chapter, subject to legislative appropriations. Interest earned on moneys in the fund must be
credited to the fund.
Compute credits grant program - Post-award monitoring
Upon completion of work performed from funding provided by a compute credits grant or
research completed by state information technology research center, the department shall
conduct an independent review of the results. Evaluation criteria may include how the work
performed has:
1. Promoted the development of advanced technology solutions , including artificial
intelligence, machine learning, quantum computing, digital literacy, and cybersecurity
initiatives;
2. Enhanced the ability of a company to make investments in the state, or otherwise
enticed a company to invest in or move to the state;
3. Led to a patent or research that is commercially viable; or
4. Positively affected workforce in the state.
SECTION 3. TRANSFER - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND TO
ADVANCED TECHNOLOGY GRANT FUND. The office of management and budget shall
transfer $5,000,000 from the strategic investment and improvements fund to the advanced
technology grant fund during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY DEPARTMENT -
COMPUTE CREDITS GRANT PROGRAM - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of
any moneys in the advanced technology grant fund in the state treasury, not otherwise
Page No. 5 25.0918.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
appropriated, the sum of $5,000,000, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the
information technology department for the purpose of the compute credits grant program, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. This funding is considered a
one-time funding item.
Page No. 6 25.0918.02000